Illinois, session 104th, HB1638.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Controlled Substances Act is 5amended by changing Section 312 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 570/312)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 1312)7    Sec. 312. Requirements for dispensing controlled 8substances. 9    (a) A practitioner, in good faith, may dispense a Schedule 10II controlled substance, which is a narcotic drug listed in 11Section 206 of this Act; or which contains any quantity of 12amphetamine or methamphetamine, their salts, optical isomers 13or salts of optical isomers; phenmetrazine and its salts; or 14pentazocine; and Schedule III, IV, or V controlled substances 15to any person upon a written or electronic prescription of any 16prescriber, dated and signed by the person prescribing (or 17electronically validated in compliance with Section 311.5) on 18the day when issued and bearing the name and address of the 19patient for whom, or the owner of the animal for which the 20controlled substance is dispensed, and the full name, address 21and registry number under the laws of the United States 22relating to controlled substances of the prescriber, if he or 23she is required by those laws to be registered. If the   HB1638- 2 -LRB104 07471 RLC 17513 b1prescription is for an animal it shall state the species of 2animal for which it is ordered. The practitioner filling the 3prescription shall, unless otherwise permitted, write the date 4of filling and his or her own signature on the face of the 5written prescription or, alternatively, shall indicate such 6filling using a unique identifier as defined in paragraph (v) 7of Section 3 of the Pharmacy Practice Act. The written 8prescription shall be retained on file by the practitioner who 9filled it or pharmacy in which the prescription was filled for 10a period of 2 years, so as to be readily accessible for 11inspection or removal by any officer or employee engaged in 12the enforcement of this Act. Whenever the practitioner's or 13pharmacy's copy of any prescription is removed by an officer 14or employee engaged in the enforcement of this Act, for the 15purpose of investigation or as evidence, such officer or 16employee shall give to the practitioner or pharmacy a receipt 17in lieu thereof. If the specific prescription is machine or 18computer generated and printed at the prescriber's office, the 19date does not need to be handwritten. A prescription for a 20Schedule II controlled substance shall not be issued for more 21than a 30 day supply, except as provided in subsection (a-5), 22and shall be valid for up to 90 days after the date of 23issuance. A written prescription for Schedule III, IV or V 24controlled substances shall not be filled or refilled more 25than 6 months after the date thereof or refilled more than 5 26times unless renewed, in writing, by the prescriber. A   HB1638- 3 -LRB104 07471 RLC 17513 b1pharmacy shall maintain a policy regarding the type of 2identification necessary, if any, to receive a prescription in 3accordance with State and federal law. The pharmacy must post 4such information where prescriptions are filled.5    (a-5) Physicians may issue multiple prescriptions (3 6sequential 30-day supplies) for the same Schedule II 7controlled substance, authorizing up to a 90-day supply. 8Before authorizing a 90-day supply of a Schedule II controlled 9substance, the physician must meet the following conditions:10        (1) Each separate prescription must be issued for a 11    legitimate medical purpose by an individual physician 12    acting in the usual course of professional practice.13        (2) The individual physician must provide written 14    instructions on each prescription (other than the first 15    prescription, if the prescribing physician intends for the 16    prescription to be filled immediately) indicating the 17    earliest date on which a pharmacy may fill that 18    prescription. 19        (3) The physician shall document in the medical record 20    of a patient the medical necessity for the amount and 21    duration of the 3 sequential 30-day prescriptions for 22    Schedule II narcotics. 23    (a-10) Prescribers who issue a prescription for an opioid 24shall inform the patient that opioids are addictive and that 25opioid antagonists are available by prescription or from a 26pharmacy.   HB1638- 4 -LRB104 07471 RLC 17513 b1    (b) In lieu of a written prescription required by this 2Section, a pharmacist, in good faith, may dispense Schedule 3III, IV, or V substances to any person either upon receiving a 4facsimile of a written, signed prescription transmitted by the 5prescriber or the prescriber's agent or upon a lawful oral 6prescription of a prescriber which oral prescription shall be 7reduced promptly to writing by the pharmacist and such written 8memorandum thereof shall be dated on the day when such oral 9prescription is received by the pharmacist and shall bear the 10full name and address of the ultimate user for whom, or of the 11owner of the animal for which the controlled substance is 12dispensed, and the full name, address, and registry number 13under the law of the United States relating to controlled 14substances of the prescriber prescribing if he or she is 15required by those laws to be so registered, and the pharmacist 16filling such oral prescription shall write the date of filling 17and his or her own signature on the face of such written 18memorandum thereof. The facsimile copy of the prescription or 19written memorandum of the oral prescription shall be retained 20on file by the proprietor of the pharmacy in which it is filled 21for a period of not less than two years, so as to be readily 22accessible for inspection by any officer or employee engaged 23in the enforcement of this Act in the same manner as a written 24prescription. The facsimile copy of the prescription or oral 25prescription and the written memorandum thereof shall not be 26filled or refilled more than 6 months after the date thereof or   HB1638- 5 -LRB104 07471 RLC 17513 b1be refilled more than 5 times, unless renewed, in writing, by 2the prescriber.3    (c) Except for any non-prescription targeted 4methamphetamine precursor regulated by the Methamphetamine 5Precursor Control Act, a controlled substance included in 6Schedule V shall not be distributed or dispensed other than 7for a medical purpose and not for the purpose of evading this 8Act, and then:9        (1) only personally by a person registered to dispense 10    a Schedule V controlled substance and then only to his or 11    her patients, or12        (2) only personally by a pharmacist, and then only to 13    a person over 21 years of age who has identified himself or 14    herself to the pharmacist by means of 2 positive documents 15    of identification.16    The dispenser shall record the name and address of the 17purchaser, the name and quantity of the product, the date and 18time of the sale, and the dispenser's signature.19    No person shall purchase or be dispensed more than 120 20milliliters or more than 120 grams of any Schedule V substance 21which contains codeine, dihydrocodeine, or any salts thereof, 22or ethylmorphine, or any salts thereof, in any 96-hour period. 23The purchaser shall sign a form, approved by the Department of 24Financial and Professional Regulation, attesting that he or 25she has not purchased any Schedule V controlled substances 26within the immediately preceding 96 hours.  HB1638- 6 -LRB104 07471 RLC 17513 b1    All records of purchases and sales shall be maintained for 2not less than 2 years.3    No person shall obtain or attempt to obtain within any 4consecutive 96-hour period any Schedule V substances of more 5than 120 milliliters or more than 120 grams containing 6codeine, dihydrocodeine or any of its salts, or ethylmorphine 7or any of its salts. Any person obtaining any such 8preparations or combination of preparations in excess of this 9limitation shall be in unlawful possession of such controlled 10substance.11    A person qualified to dispense controlled substances under 12this Act and registered thereunder shall at no time maintain 13or keep in stock a quantity of Schedule V controlled 14substances in excess of 4.5 liters for each substance; a 15pharmacy shall at no time maintain or keep in stock a quantity 16of Schedule V controlled substances as defined in excess of 174.5 liters for each substance, plus the additional quantity of 18controlled substances necessary to fill the largest number of 19prescription orders filled by that pharmacy for such 20controlled substances in any one week in the previous year. 21These limitations shall not apply to Schedule V controlled 22substances which Federal law prohibits from being dispensed 23without a prescription.24    No person shall distribute or dispense butyl nitrite for 25inhalation or other introduction into the human body for 26euphoric or physical effect.  HB1638- 7 -LRB104 07471 RLC 17513 b1    (d) Every practitioner shall keep a record or log of 2controlled substances received by him or her and a record of 3all such controlled substances administered, dispensed or 4professionally used by him or her otherwise than by 5prescription. It shall, however, be sufficient compliance with 6this paragraph if any practitioner utilizing controlled 7substances listed in Schedules III, IV and V shall keep a 8record of all those substances dispensed and distributed by 9him or her other than those controlled substances which are 10administered by the direct application of a controlled 11substance, whether by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any 12other means to the body of a patient or research subject. A 13practitioner who dispenses, other than by administering, a 14controlled substance in Schedule II, which is a narcotic drug 15listed in Section 206 of this Act, or which contains any 16quantity of amphetamine or methamphetamine, their salts, 17optical isomers or salts of optical isomers, pentazocine, or 18methaqualone shall do so only upon the issuance of a written 19prescription blank or electronic prescription issued by a 20prescriber.21    (d-1) Any person, other than the person for whom a 22Schedule II controlled substance is prescribed, who receives 23the prescribed Schedule II controlled substance at a pharmacy 24shall provide:25        (1) identifying information of the person for whom the 26    controlled substance is prescribed; and  HB1638- 8 -LRB104 07471 RLC 17513 b1        (2) photo identification given to the pharmacy, which 2    shall keep a photo copy in the file of the person for whom 3    the controlled substance is prescribed for a period of 90 4    days. 5    (e) Whenever a manufacturer distributes a controlled 6substance in a package prepared by him or her, and whenever a 7wholesale distributor distributes a controlled substance in a 8package prepared by him or her or the manufacturer, he or she 9shall securely affix to each package in which that substance 10is contained a label showing in legible English the name and 11address of the manufacturer, the distributor and the quantity, 12kind and form of controlled substance contained therein. No 13person except a pharmacist and only for the purposes of 14filling a prescription under this Act, shall alter, deface or 15remove any label so affixed.16    (f) Whenever a practitioner dispenses any controlled 17substance except a non-prescription Schedule V product or a 18non-prescription targeted methamphetamine precursor regulated 19by the Methamphetamine Precursor Control Act, he or she shall 20affix to the container in which such substance is sold or 21dispensed, a label indicating the date of initial filling, the 22practitioner's name and address, the name of the patient, the 23name of the prescriber, the directions for use and cautionary 24statements, if any, contained in any prescription or required 25by law, the proprietary name or names or the established name 26of the controlled substance, and the dosage and quantity,   HB1638- 9 -LRB104 07471 RLC 17513 b1except as otherwise authorized by regulation by the Department 2of Financial and Professional Regulation. No person shall 3alter, deface or remove any label so affixed as long as the 4specific medication remains in the container.5    (g) A person to whom or for whose use any controlled 6substance has been prescribed or dispensed by a practitioner, 7or other persons authorized under this Act, and the owner of 8any animal for which such substance has been prescribed or 9dispensed by a veterinarian, may lawfully possess such 10substance only in the container in which it was delivered to 11him or her by the person dispensing such substance.12    (h) The responsibility for the proper prescribing or 13dispensing of controlled substances that are under the 14prescriber's direct control is upon the prescriber. The 15responsibility for the proper filling of a prescription for 16controlled substance drugs rests with the pharmacist. An order 17purporting to be a prescription issued to any individual, 18which is not in the regular course of professional treatment 19nor part of an authorized methadone maintenance program, nor 20in legitimate and authorized research instituted by any 21accredited hospital, educational institution, charitable 22foundation, or federal, state or local governmental agency, 23and which is intended to provide that individual with 24controlled substances sufficient to maintain that individual's 25or any other individual's, habitual or customary use, 26dependence, or diversion of that controlled substance is not a   HB1638- 10 -LRB104 07471 RLC 17513 b1prescription within the meaning and intent of this Act; and 2the person issuing it, shall be subject to the penalties 3provided for violations of the law relating to controlled 4substances.5    (i) A prescriber shall not pre-print or cause to be 6pre-printed a prescription for any controlled substance; nor 7shall any practitioner issue, fill or cause to be issued or 8filled, a pre-printed prescription for any controlled 9substance.10    (i-5) A prescriber may use a machine or electronic device 11to individually generate a printed prescription, but the 12prescriber is still required to affix his or her manual 13signature. 14    (j) No person shall manufacture, dispense, deliver, 15possess with intent to deliver, prescribe, or administer or 16cause to be administered under his or her direction any 17anabolic steroid, for any use in humans other than the 18treatment of disease in accordance with the order of a 19physician licensed to practice medicine in all its branches 20for a valid medical purpose in the course of professional 21practice. The use of anabolic steroids for the purpose of 22hormonal manipulation that is intended to increase muscle 23mass, strength or weight without a medical necessity to do so, 24or for the intended purpose of improving physical appearance 25or performance in any form of exercise, sport, or game, is not 26a valid medical purpose or in the course of professional   HB1638- 11 -LRB104 07471 RLC 17513 b1practice.2    (k) Controlled substances may be mailed if all of the 3following conditions are met:4        (1) The controlled substances are not outwardly 5    dangerous and are not likely, of their own force, to cause 6    injury to a person's life or health.7        (2) The inner container of a parcel containing 8    controlled substances must be marked and sealed as 9    required under this Act and its rules, and be placed in a 10    plain outer container or securely wrapped in plain paper.11        (3) If the controlled substances consist of 12    prescription medicines, the inner container must be 13    labeled to show the name and address of the pharmacy or 14    practitioner dispensing the prescription.15        (4) The outside wrapper or container must be free of 16    markings that would indicate the nature of the contents. 17    (l) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act to the 18contrary, emergency medical services personnel may administer 19Schedule II, III, IV, or V controlled substances to a person in 20the scope of their employment without a written, electronic, 21or oral prescription of a prescriber. 22(Source: P.A. 102-1040, eff. 1-1-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 23103-881, eff. 1-1-25.)